Louisiana, session 2026, HB1239.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:335(A)(2)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§335. Joint custody decree and implementation order; custody during an emergency
or disaster
A.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(b) Unless the court determines To the extent it is not feasible and or in the
best interest of the child, physical custody of the children should child shall be
shared equally.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.